Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 16 Judgments Generally

Cross references. —

As to judgments in civil actions before justices of the peace, see §§

1-21-401

to

1-21-403

.

As to judgment with reference to Uniform Arbitration Act, see §

1-36-116

.

As to judgment and enforcement by police justice courts in cities of the first class, see §

5-6-208

.

For provision that judgment against county shall be paid by tax levy, see §

18-2-111

.

As to judgment in connection with removal of county officer, see §

18-3-902

.

As to definition and form of judgment, see Rule 54, W.R.C.P.

As to default judgments, see Rule 55, W.R.C.P.

As to summary judgment, see Rule 56, W.R.C.P.

Editor's notes. —

Inasmuch as there is no chapter 16 in § 1, ch. 188, Laws 1977, which revised title 1, this and the following chapters in this title have been renumbered so as to maintain proper numerical sequence and internal references in the statutes have been changed accordingly throughout the title.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

49 C.J.S. Judgments § 1 et seq.